Utah statutes.
10-8-51.   Beggars, prostitutes, swindlers -- Punishment.

They may provide for the punishment of tramps, street beggars, prostitutes, habitual disturbers of the peace, pickpockets, gamblers and thieves, or persons who practice any game, trick or device with intent to swindle.

